Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3317
Legal service insurance corporation; reserves.

A corporation organized under sections 44-3312 and 44-3313 shall maintain the reserves necessary for the sound operation of the business, including unearned premium reserves. The amount and manner of calculating such reserves shall be determined by rule of the director.

Laws 1979, LB 52, § 17.